Washington statutes.
RCW 5.56.070

Attachment of witness.

The court, judge, or other officer, in such case, may issue an attachment to bring such witness before them to answer for contempt, and also testify as witness in the cause in which he or she was subpoenaed.

[ 1987 c 202 s 125; Code 1881 s 400; 1877 p 88 s 402; 1869 p 106 s 395; 1854 p 188 s 302; RRS s 1221.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 45(f).

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

District court, attachment for nonappearance: RCW 12.16.030.